Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-405
Seller; age restriction; identification required.

No secondary metals recycler shall purchase or receive regulated metals property:

(1) From any person who is under the age of majority; or

(2) From any person who does not possess a valid form of personal identification or current motor vehicle operator's license required under section 69-402 at the time of the recorded transaction.

Laws 2008, LB766, § 5.